pathway/XeLaTexConvert/XeLaTexExe/share/texmf/tex/generic/hyphen/dehyphn.tex
% This is `dehyphn.tex', revision level 31
%
% %%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
% dehyphn   --  TeX-Trennmuster fuer die
%               neue deutsche Rechtschreibung
%
%               TeX hyphenation patterns for the
%               new German orthography
% %%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
%
%
% Copyright (C) 1988,1991 Rechenzentrum der Ruhr-Universitaet Bochum
%               [german hyphen patterns]
% Copyright (C) 1993,1994,1999 Bernd Raichle/DANTE e.V.
%               [macros, adaption for TeX 2]
% Copyright (C) 1998--2001 Walter Schmidt
%               [adaption to new German orthography]
%
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% IMPORTANT NOTICE:
%
% This program can be redistributed and/or modified under the terms
% of the LaTeX Project Public License Distributed from CTAN
% archives in directory macros/latex/base/lppl.txt; either
% version 1 of the License, or any later version.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
%
%
% For use with TeX generated by
%
%          Norbert Schwarz
%          Rechenzentrum Ruhr-Universitaet Bochum
%          Universitaetsstrasse 150
%          D-44721 Bochum, Germany
%
%
% Adaption of these patterns for TeX, Version 2.x and 3.x and
% all fonts in T1/`Cork'/EC/DC and/or OT1/CM encoding
% (ghyph31.tex/dehypht.tex) by
%
%          Bernd Raichle
%          Stettener Str. 73
%          D-73732 Esslingen, Germany
%   Email: raichle@Informatik.Uni-Stuttgart.DE
%
%
% Adapted to new German orthography (gnhyph01.tex/dehyphn.tex) by
%
%          Walter Schmidt
%          Schornbaumstr. 2
%          D-91052 Erlangen, Germany
%   Email: was@VR-Web.de
%
% ***   Please, send error reports to the latter address only!   ***
% ***                                                            ***
% ***   Please, do _not_ report errors occuring in conjunction   ***
% ***   with the traditional german hyphenation patterns         ***
% ***   dehypht.tex or ghyph31.tex, too.                         ***
%
%
% Additional documentation can be found near the end of this file.
%
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
%
\message{New German Hyphenation Patterns `dehyphn' Rev.31 <2001-05-07> (WaS)}
%
% Next we define some commands which are used inside the patterns.
% To keep them local, we enclose the rest of the file in a group
% (The \patterns command globally changes the hyphenation trie!).
%
\begingroup
%
%
% Make sure that doublequote is not active:
\catcode`\"=12
%
%
% Because ^^e4 is used in the following macros which is read by
% TeX 2.x as ^^e or %, the comment character of TeX, some trick
% has to be found to avoid this problem.  The same is true for the
% character ^^f or & in the TeX 2.x code.
% Therefore in the code the exclamationmark ! is used instead of
% the circumflex ^ and its \catcode is set appropriately
% (normally \catcode`\!=12, in the code \catcode`\!=7).
%
% The following \catcode, \lccode assignments and macro definitions
% are defined in such a way that the following \pattern{...} list
% can be used for both, TeX 2.x and TeX 3.x.
%
% We first change the \lccode of ^^Y to make sure that we can
% include this character in the hyphenation patterns.
%
\catcode`\^^Y=11 \lccode`\^^Y=`\^^Y
%
% Then we have to define some macros depending on the TeX version.
% Therefore we have to distinguish TeX version 2.x and 3.x:
%
\ifnum`\@=`\^^40 % true => TeX 3.x
  %
  % For TeX 3:
  % ----------
  %
  % Assign appropriate \catcode and \lccode values for all
  % accented characters used in the patterns (\uccode changes are
  % not used within \patterns{...} and thus not necessary):
  %
  \catcode"E4=11 \catcode"C4=11 % \"a \"A
  \catcode"F6=11 \catcode"D6=11 % \"o \"O
  \catcode"FC=11 \catcode"DC=11 % \"u \"U
  \catcode"FF=11 \catcode"DF=11 % \ss  SS
  %
  \lccode"C4="E4 \uccode"C4="C4  \lccode"E4="E4 \uccode"E4="C4
  \lccode"D6="F6 \uccode"D6="D6  \lccode"F6="F6 \uccode"F6="D6
  \lccode"DC="FC \uccode"DC="DC  \lccode"FC="FC \uccode"FC="DC
  \lccode"DF="FF \uccode"DF="DF  \lccode"FF="FF \uccode"FF="DF
  %
  % In the following definitions we use ??xy instead of ^^xy
  % to avoid errors when reading the following macro definitions
  % with TeX 2.x (remember ^^e(4) is the comment character):
  %
  \catcode`\?=7
  %
  % Define the accent macro " in such a way that it
  % expands to single letters in font encoding T1.
  \catcode`\"=13
  \def"#1{\ifx#1a??e4\else \ifx#1o??f6\else \ifx#1u??fc\else
      \errmessage{Hyphenation pattern file corrupted!}%
    \fi\fi\fi}
  %
  %   - patterns with umlauts are ok
  \def\n#1{#1}
  %
  % For \ss which exists in T1 _and_ OT1 encoded fonts but with
  % different glyph codes, duplicated patterns for both encodings
  % are included.  Thus you can use these hyphenation patterns for
  % T1 and OT1 encoded fonts:
  %   - define \3 to be code `\^^ff (\ss in font encoding T1)
  %   - define \9 to be code `\^^Y  (\ss in font encoding OT1)
  \def\3{??ff}
  \def\9{??Y}
  %   - duplicated patterns to support font encoding OT1 are ok
  \def\c#1{#1}
  %   >>>>>>  UNCOMMENT the next line, if you do not want
  %   >>>>>>  to use fonts in font encoding OT1
  %\def\c#1{}
  %
  \catcode`\?=12
  %
\else
  %
  % For TeX 2:
  % ----------
  %
  % Define the accent macro " to throw an error message.
  \catcode`\"=13
  \def"#1{\errmessage{Hyphenation pattern file corrupted!}}
  %
  %   - ignore all patterns with umlauts
  \def\n#1{}
  %
  % With TeX 2 fonts in encoding T1 can be used, but all glyphs
  % in positions > 127 can not be used in hyphenation patterns.
  % Thus only patterns with glyphs in OT1 positions are included:
  %   - define \3 to be code ^^Y (\ss in CM font encoding)
  %   - define \9 to throw an error message
  \def\3{^^Y}
  \def\9{\errmessage{Hyphenation pattern file corrupted!}}
  %   - ignore all duplicated patterns with \ss in T1 encoding
  \def\c#1{}
  %
\fi
%
%
\patterns{%
.aa6l .ab3a4s .ab3ei .abi2 .ab3it .ab1l .ab1r .ab3u .ad3o4r .alti6
.ana3c .an5alg .an1e 
.ang8s2t1 % .ang8s (des einzige Wort, das mit angs... beginnt !)
.an1s .ap1p .ar6sc .ar6ta .ar6tei .as2z
.au2f1 .au2s3 .be5erb .be3na .ber6t5r .bie6r5 .bim6s5t .brot3 .bru6s
.ch6 .che6f5 .da8c .da2r .dar5in .dar5u .den6ka .de5r6en .des6pe
.de8spo .de3sz .dia3s4 .dien4 .dy2s1 .ehren5 .eine6 .ei6n5eh .ei8nen
.ein5sa .en6der .en6d5r .en3k4 .en8ta8 .en8tei .en4t3r .epo1 .er6ban
.er6b5ei .er6bla .er6d5um .er3ei .er5er .er3in .er3o4b .erwi5s .es1p
.es8t1l  .es8t1n % .es8t
.ex1a2 .ex3em .fal6sc .fe6st5a .flu4g3 .furch8 .ga6ner .ge3n4a
\n{.ge5r"o} 
.ges6
.halb5 .halbe6 .hal6br .haup4 .hau4t .heima6 .he4r3e
.her6za .he5x .hin3 .hir8sc .ho4c .hu3sa .hy5o .ibe5 .ima6ge .in1
.ini6 .is5chi .jagd5 .kal6k5o .ka6ph .ki4e .kop6f3 .kraf6 \n{.k"u5ra}
.lab6br .liie6 .lo6s5k \n{.l"o4s3t} .ma5d .mi2t1 .no6th .no6top
.obe8ri .ob1l .obs2 .ob6st5e .or3c .ort6s5e .ost3a .oste8r .pe4re
.pe3ts .ph6 .po8str .rau4m3 .re5an .ro8q .ru5the \n{.r"u5be}
% \n{.r"u8stet} 
.sch8 .se6e .se5n6h .se5ra .si2e .spi6ke .st4 .sy2n
.tages5 .tan6kl .ta8th .te6e .te8str .to6der .to8nin .to6we .um1
.umpf4 .un1 .une6 .unge5n .ur1c .ur5en .ve6rin .vora8 .wah6l5 .we8ges
.we8s2t .wes3te
.wo6r .wor3a .wun4s .zi4e .zuch8 \n{."ande8re} \n{."och8} aa1c aa2gr
aal5e aa6r5a a5arti aa2s1t aat2s 6aba ab3art 1abdr 6abel aben6dr
ab5erk ab5err ab5esse 1abf 1abg \n{1abh"a} ab1ir 1abko a1bl ab1la
5ablag a6bla\3 \c{a6bla\9} ab4ler ab1lu \n{a8bl"a} \n{5a6bl"o} abma5c
1abn ab1ra ab1re 5a6brec ab1ro 
ab1s
ab8sk abs2z 3abtei ab1ur 1abw
5abze 5abzu \n{ab1"an} \n{ab"au8} a4ce.  a5chal ach5art ach5au a1che
a8chent ach6er.  a6ch5erf a1chi ach1l ach3m ach5n a1cho ach3re a1chu
ach1w a1chy \n{ach5"af} ack1o acks6t ack5sta a1d 8ad.  a6d5ac ad3ant
ad8ar 5addi a8dein ade5o8 adi5en 1adj 1adle ad1op a2dre 3adres adt1
1adv \n{a6d"a} a1e2d ae1r a1er.  1aero 8afa a3fal af1an a5far a5fat
af1au a6fentl a2f1ex af1fr af5rau af1re 1afri af6tent af6tra aft5re
a6f5um \n{8af"a} ag5abe 5a4gent ag8er ages5e 1aggr ag5las ag1lo a1gn
ag2ne 1agog a6g5und a1ha a1he ah5ein a4h3erh a1hi ahl1a ah1le ah4m3ar
ahn1a a5ho ahra6 ahr5ab ah1re ah8rei ahren8s ahre4s3 ahr8ti ah1ru a1hu
\n{ah8"o} ai3d2s ai1e aif6 a3inse ai4re.  a5isch.  ais8e a3ismu ais6n
aiso6 a1j 1akad a4kade a1ke a1ki 1akko 5akro1 a5lal al5ans 3al8arm
al8beb al8berw alb5la 3album al1c a1le a6l5e6be a4l3ein a8lel a8lerb
a8lerh a6lert 5a6l5eth 1algi al4gli al3int al4lab al8lan al4l3ar
alle3g a1lo a4l5ob al6schm al4the 
% altist5 
al4t3re 8a1lu alu5i a6lur
alu3ta \n{a1l"a} a6mate 8ame.  5a6meise am6m5ei am6mum am2n ampf3a
am6schw am2ta a1mu \n{a1m"a} a3nac a1nad anadi5e an3ako an3alp 3analy
an3ame an3ara a1nas an5asti a1nat anat5s an8dent ande4s3 an1ec an5eis
an1e2k 4aner.  a6n5erd a8nerf a6n5erke 1anfa 5anfert \n{1anf"a} 3angab
5angebo an3gli ang6lis an2gn 3angri ang5t6 \n{5anh"a} ani5g ani4ka
an5i8on an1kl an6kno an4kro 1anl anma5c anmar4 3annah anne4s3 a1no
5a6n1o2d 5a6n3oma 5a6nord 1anr an1sa 5anschl an4soz an1st 5anstal
an1s2z 5antenn an1th \n{5anw"a} a5ny an4z3ed 5anzeig 5anzieh 3anzug
\n{an1"a} \n{5an"as} \n{a1n"o} \n{an"o8d} a1os a1pa 3apfel a2ph1t
\n{aph5"a6} a1pi 8apl apo1c apo1s 
a6pos2t % a6pos2te 
a6poth 1appa ap1pr a1pr
\n{a5p"a} \n{a3p"u} a1ra a4r3af ar3all 3arbei 2arbt ar1c 2a1re ar3ein
ar2gl 2a1ri ari5es ar8kers ar6les ar4nan ar5o6ch ar1o2d a1rol ar3ony
a8ror a3ros ar5ox ar6schl 8artei ar6t5ri a1ru a1ry 1arzt arz1w
\n{ar8z"a} \n{ar"a8m} \n{ar"o6} \n{ar5"om} \n{ar1"u2} a1sa a6schec
asch5l asch3m a6schn a3s4hi as1pa asp5l 
% a8steb % ueberfluessig ?
as5tev 1asth 
% a6stoc % ueberfluessig ?
a1str ast3re 8a1ta ata5c ata3la a6tapf ata5pl a1te a6teli aten5a
ate5ran 6atf 6atg a1th at3hal 1athl 2a1ti 5atlant 3atlas 8atmus 6atn
a1to a6t5ops ato6ra a6t5ort.  4a1tr a6t5ru at2t1h \n{at5t6h"a} 6a1tu
atz1w \n{a1t"a} \n{a1t"u} au1a au6bre auch3a au1e aue4l 5aufent
\n{3auff"u} 3aufga 1aufn auf1t 3auftr 1aufw 3auge.  au4kle aule8s 6aum
au8mar aum5p 1ausb 3ausd 1ausf 1ausg au8sin 
% 3auss 
au4sta 1ausw 1ausz
aut5eng au1th 1auto au\3e8 \c{au\9e8} a1v ave5r6a aver6i a1w a6wes a1x
a2xia a6xio a1ya a1z azi5er.  8a\3 \c{8a\9} 1ba 8ba8del ba1la ba1na
ban6k5r ba5ot bardi6n ba1ro basten6 bau3sp 2b1b bb6le b2bli 2b1c 2b1d
1be be1a be8at.  be1ch 8becht 8becke.  be5el be1en bee8rei be5eta bef2
8beff be1g2 \n{beh"o8} bei1s 6b5eisen bei3tr b8el bel8o belu3t be3nac
bend6o be6ners be6nerw be4nor ben4se6 bens5el \n{be1n"a} \n{be1n"u}
be1o2 b8er.  be1ra be8rac ber8gab.  ber1r \n{be1r"u} bes8c bes5erh
bes2p be5tha bet5sc be1un be1ur 8bex be6zwec 2b1f8 
% bfe6st5e 
2b1g2
bga2s5 bge1 2b1h bhole6 1bi bi1bl b6ie bi1el bi1la \n{bil"a5} bi1na
bi4nok 
% bi5str 
bi6stu bi5tr bit4t5r b1j 2b1k2 \n{bk"u6} bl8 b6la.
6b1lad 6blag 8blam 1blat b8latt 3blau.  b6lav 3ble.  b1leb b1led
8b1leg 8b1leh 8bleid 8bleih 6b3lein 
% blei3s 
ble4m3o 4blich b4lind
8bling b2lio 5blit b4litz b1loh 8b1los 1blu 5blum 2blun blut3a blut5sc
\n{3bl"a} \n{bl"as5c} \n{5bl"o} \n{3bl"u} \n{bl"u8sc} 2b1m 2b1n 1bo
bo1ch bo5d6s boe5 8boff 8bonk bo1ra b1ort 2b1p2 b1q 1br brail6 brast8
bre4a b5red 8bref 8b5riem b6riga bro1s b1rup b2ruz \n{8br"oh}
\n{br"os5c} 8bs b1sa b8sang b2s1ar b1sc bs3erl bs3erz b8sof b1s2p
bst1h b3stru \n{b5st"a} b6sun 2b1t b2t1h 1bu bu1ie bul6k b8ure bu6sin
6b1v 2b1w 1by1 by6te.  8b1z 
% bzi1s % ueberfluessig ?
\n{1b"a} \n{b5"a6s5} \n{1b"u}
\n{b6"u5bere} \n{b"uge6} \n{b"ugel5e} \n{b"ur6sc} 1ca cag6 ca5la ca6re
ca5y c1c 1ce celi4c celich5 ce1ro c8h 2ch.  1chae ch1ah ch3akt cha6mer
8chanz 5chara 3chari 5chato 6chb 1chef 6chei ch3eil ch3eis 6cherkl
6chf 4chh 5chiad 5chias 6chins 8chj chl6 5chlor 6ch2m 2chn6 ch8nie
5cho.  8chob choi8d 6chp ch3ren ch6res \n{ch3r"u} 2chs 2cht cht5ha
cht3hi 5chthon ch6tin 6chuh chu4la 6ch3unt chut6t 8chw 1ci ci5tr c2k
2ck.  ck1ei 4ckh ck3l ck3n ck5o8f ck1r 2cks ck5stra ck6s5u c2l 1c8o
con6ne 8corb cos6t c3q 1c6r 8c1t 1cu 1cy \n{5c"a1} \n{c"o5} 1da.
8daas 2dabg 8dabr 6dabt 6dabw 1dac da2gr 6d5alk 8d5amt dan6ce.
